Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.900

Continuation of rules adopted pursuant to repealed chapter.

The repeal of chapter 22.08 RCW and the enactment of this chapter shall not be deemed to have repealed any rules adopted under the provisions of chapter 22.08 RCW and in effect immediately prior to such repeal and not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter. For the purpose of this chapter it shall be deemed that such rules have been adopted under the provisions of this chapter pursuant to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW concerning the adoption of rules.

[ 1963 c 124 s 56.]